Maryland, session 2026, SB0557.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – State Government
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from existing law.
Underlining indicates amendments to bill.
Strike out indicates matter stricken from the bill by amendment or deleted from the law by
amendment. *sb0557*

SENATE BILL 557
9–1A–01.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(s) (1) “Own” means having a beneficial or proprietary interest of at least 5%
in the property or business of an applicant or licensee.
(2) “OWN” DOES NOT INCLUDE HAVING A BENEFICIAL OR
PROPRIETARY INTEREST OF 25% 15% OR LESS IN THE PROPERTY OR BUSINESS OF
AN APPLICANT OR LICENSEE, IF THE INTEREST:
(I) THE INTEREST DOES NOT CONFER ANY VOTING RIGHTS; AND
(II) 1. THE INTEREST IS HELD DIRECTLY BY A PERSON; OR
2. THE INTEREST IS HELD IN TRUST FOR THE BENEFIT
OF A PERSON, PROVIDED THAT THE TRUSTEE DOES NOT EXERCISE ANY VOTING
RIGHTS OR CONTROL OVER THE APPLICANT OR LICENSEE; AND
(III) BEFORE THE TRANSFER OR ISSUANCE OF THE INTEREST,
THE APPLICANT OR LICENSEE SUBMITS:
1. WRITTEN NOTICE AND CERTIFICATION TO THE
COMMISSION, IN THE FORM REQUIRED BY THE COMMISSION, THAT THE PERSON
DESCRIBED IN ITEM (II) OF THIS PARAGRAPH IS NOT DISQUALIFIED FOR A VIDEO
LOTTERY EMPLOYEE LICENSE UNDER § 9–1A–14(C)(1)(III) AND (IV) OF THIS
SUBTITLE; AND
2. A STATE AND NATIONAL CRIMINAL HISTORY
RECORDS CHECK, INCLUDING THE SUBMISSION OF FINGERPRINTS, IN ACCORDANCE
WITH TITLE 10, SUBTITLE 2, PART III OF THE CRIMINAL PROCEDURE ARTICLE.
9–1A–05.
(b) An owner or operator of a video lottery destination location described under §
9–1A–01 of this subtitle may submit an application for a video lottery operation license.
(d) (1) In this subsection, “owner” includes any type of owner or beneficiary of
a business entity, including an officer, director, principal employee, partner, investor,
stockholder, or beneficial owner of the business entity and, notwithstanding any other
provisions of this subtitle, including a person having any ownership interest regardless of
the percentage of ownership interest.

SENATE BILL 557 3
(2) An individual or business entity may not own an interest in more than
one video lottery facility.
(3) A member of the Senate of Maryland or the House of Delegates may not
be an owner or an employee of any business entity that holds a video lottery operation
license.
9–1A–08.
(a) In addition to other information required by this subtitle, a business entity
applying for a video lottery operation license shall provide the following information:
(5) the rights and privileges acquired by the holders of different classes of
authorized securities, partnership interests, or other similar ownership interests of the
business entity and its holding, intermediary, and subsidiary companies or other similar
business entities;
(6) the terms on which the securities, partnership interests, or other
similar ownership interests have been or are to be offered;
(10) the names of persons who own or control the business entity;
(d) The Commission shall disqualify an applicant for a video lottery operation
license on the basis of any of the following criteria:
(1) failure of the applicant to prove by clear and convincing evidence that
the applicant and each person who owns or controls the application are qualified under the
provisions of this subtitle;
9–1A–12.
If a video lottery operation licensee contracts with another person other than an
employee of the video lottery operation licensee to provide any of the services related to
operating a video lottery facility, each person and each other person who owns or controls
the person or management and supervisory personnel and other principal employees of the
person shall qualify under the standards and provisions set forth in §§ 9–1A–07 and
9–1A–08 of this subtitle for video lottery operation licensees.
9–1E–03.
(a) (1) Unless the context requires otherwise, the requirements under §§
9–1A–04, 9–1A–06, 9–1A–07, 9–1A–08, 9–1A–12, 9–1A–14, 9–1A–18, 9–1A–19, 9–1A–20,
and 9–1A–25 of this title apply to the authority, duties, and responsibilities of the
Commission, a sports wagering licensee, and an employee or a contractor of a sports
wagering licensee under this subtitle.

SENATE BILL 557
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.